zh-CN: 包含紧固件组件: 仅眼扣; 钩棒扣套装; 钩眼扣套装; 仅钩扣; 其他
ja: 付属のファスナーコンポーネント: アイのみ; フック＆バーセット; フック＆アイセット; フックのみ; その他
pl: Dołączone elementy zapięcia: Tylko haftki; Zestaw haftka i uszko; Zestaw haftka i oczko; Tylko haki; Inne
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα στερέωσης: Μόνο θηλιές; Σετ γάντζου & μπαρέτας; Σετ γάντζου & θηλιάς; Μόνο γάντζοι; Άλλο
da: Medfølgende fastgørelseskomponenter: Kun maller; Sæt med hægter og trenser; Sæt med hægter og maller; Kun hægter; Andet
hu: Mellékelt rögzítőelemek: Csak szemek; Horog és rúd készlet; Francia kapocs készlet; Csak horgok; Egyéb
tr: Dahil olan bağlantı/sabitleme parçaları: Yalnızca kopçalar; Kanca ve çubuk seti; Agraf ve kopça seti; Yalnızca kancalar; Diğer
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia komponentov spojovacích prvkov: Iba očká; Súprava háčikov a pútok; Súprava háčikov a očiek; Iba háčiky; Iné
fi: Mukana tulevat kiinnityskomponentit: Vain silmukat; Koukku ja tanko -setti; Hakanen ja silmukka -setti; Vain koukut; Muu
pt-PT: Componentes de fixação incluídos: Apenas argolas; Conjunto de colchete e presilha; Conjunto de colchete e argola; Apenas colchetes; Outro
es: Componentes de fijación incluidos: Solo presillas; Set de gancho y barra; Set de gancho y ojal; Solo ganchos; Otro
ro-RO: Componente de fixare incluse: Doar ocheți; Set cârlig și bară; Set cârlig și ochet; Doar cârlige; Altele
ko: 포함된 체결 구성 요소: 아이 전용; 후크 및 바 세트; 후크 및 아이 세트; 후크 전용; 기타
en: Included fastener components: Eyes only; Hook & bar set; Hook & eye set; Hooks only; Other
bg-BG: Включени крепежни елементи: Само илици; Комплект кукичка и пластина; Комплект кукичка и илик; Само кукички; Други
pt-BR: Componentes de fecho incluídos: Apenas olhais; Conjunto de colchete de gancho e barra; Conjunto de colchete e argola; Apenas ganchos; Outros
fr: Composants de fixation inclus: Œillets uniquement; Ensemble agrafe et barre; Ensemble agrafe et œillet; Agrafes uniquement; Autre
zh-TW: 隨附扣件組件: 僅眼扣; 裙褲鉤組; 領鉤組; 僅鉤扣; 其他
vi: Các thành phần khóa đi kèm: Chỉ khuyết; Bộ móc và chốt cài; Bộ móc và khuyết; Chỉ móc; Khác
hr-HR: Uključene komponente za pričvršćivanje: Samo ušice; Set s kukicom i prečkom; Set s kukicom i ušicom; Samo kukice; Ostalo
lt-LT: Įtraukti tvirtinimo komponentai: Tik kilpelės; Kabliuko ir juostelės rinkinys; Kabliuko ir ąselės rinkinys; Tik kabliukai; Kita
th: รวมส่วนประกอบสำหรับยึดด้วย: ห่วงอย่างเดียว; ชุดตะขอและแถบ; ชุดตะขอและห่วง; ตะขออย่างเดียว; อื่นๆ
ru: Компоненты застежки в комплекте: Только петли; Набор крючков и планок; Набор крючков и петель; Только крючки; Другое
nb: Inkluderte festekomponenter: Kun hemper; Sett med krok og stang; Sett med krok og hempe; Kun kroker; Annet
it: Componenti di fissaggio inclusi: Solo occhielli; Set gancio e barra; Set gancetto e occhiello; Solo ganci; Altro
de: Enthaltene Befestigungskomponenten: Nur Ösen; Haken- & Riegel-Set; Haken- & Ösen-Set; Nur Haken; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vključene komponente pritrdilnih elementov: Samo zanke; Komplet sponk in zaponk; Komplet kavljev in zank; Samo kavlji; Drugo
nl: Meegeleverde sluiting onderdelen: Alleen oogjes; Haak-en-schuifset; Haak-en-oogset; Alleen haakjes; Overige
cs: Upevňovací prvky v balení: Pouze očka; Sada s háčkem a sponou; Sada háčku a očka; Pouze háčky; Jiné
sv: Fästelement som ingår: Endast hyskor; Set med byxhake och hyska; Set med hakar och hyskor; Endast hakar; Övrigt